Utah statutes.
53A-20-104.5.   School building construction and inspection manual -- Annual construction and inspection conference -- Verification of school construction inspections.

(1) (a)  The State Board of Education, through the state superintendent of public instruction, shall develop and distribute to each school district a school building construction and inspection resource manual.

(b)  The manual shall be provided to a charter school upon request of the charter school.

(2) (a)  The manual shall include current legal requirements and information on school building construction and inspections.

(b)  The state superintendent shall review and update the manual at least once every three years.

(3)  The board shall provide for an annual school construction conference to allow a representative from each school district and charter school to:

(a)  receive current information on the design, construction, and inspection of school buildings;

(b)  receive training on such matters as:

(i)  using properly certified building inspectors;

(ii)  filing construction inspection summary reports and the final inspection certification with the local governmental authority's building official;

(iii)  the roles and relationships between a school district or charter school and the local governmental authority, either a county or municipality, as related to the construction and inspection of school buildings; and

(iv)  adequate documentation of school building inspections; and

(c)  provide input on any changes that may be needed to improve the existing school building inspection program.

(4)  The board shall develop a process to verify that inspections by qualified inspectors occur in each school district or charter school.

